Hawaii statutes.
POLICE;
DISTRICT JUDGES

§231-11 Police to aid assessing or
collecting officers. The director of taxation or any assessing or
collecting officer of the department of taxation, when resisted or impeded in
the exercise of his office, may require any police officer to aid him in the
discharge of his duties, and if any such officer refuses to render aid he shall
be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor. [L 1932 2d, c 40, §11; RL 1935, §1918; RL
1945, §5114; am L 1945, c 79, §6; RL 1955, §115-15; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §16;
HRS §231-11]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next